California statutes. Vehicle Code
Any motor vehicle first registered in this state after January 1, 1940, shall be equipped with power brakes if its gross weight exceeds 14,000 pounds, except that any such vehicle having a gross weight of less than 18,000 pounds may, in lieu of power brakes, be equipped with two-stage hydraulic actuators of a type designed to increase braking effect of its brakes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 789, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

26301.5.

Every passenger vehicle manufactured and first registered after January 1, 1973, except motorcycles, shall be equipped with an emergency brake system so constructed that rupture or leakage-type failure of any single pressure component of the service brake system, except structural failures of the brake master cylinder body or effectiveness indicator body, shall not result in complete loss of function of the vehicle’s brakes when force on the brake pedal is continued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1110.)
-------------------------------------------

26302.

(a) Every trailer or semitrailer, manufactured and first registered after January 1, 1940, and having a gross weight of 6,000 pounds or more and which is operated at a speed of 20 miles per hour or over shall be equipped with brakes.

(b) Every trailer or semitrailer manufactured and first registered after January 1, 1966, and having a gross weight of 3,000 pounds or more shall be equipped with brakes on at least two wheels.

(c) Every trailer or semitrailer manufactured after January 1, 1982, and equipped
 with air brakes shall be equipped with brakes on all wheels.

(d) Brakes required on trailers or semitrailers shall be adequate, supplemental to the brakes on the towing vehicle, to enable the combination of vehicles to comply with the stopping distance requirements of Section 26454.

(e) The provisions of this section shall not apply to any vehicle being used to support the boom or mast attached to a mobile crane or shovel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 774, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

26303.

Every trailer coach and every camp trailer having a gross weight of 1,500 pounds or more, but exclusive of passengers, shall be equipped with brakes on at least two wheels which are adequate, supplemental to the brakes on the towing vehicle, to enable the combination of vehicles to comply with the stopping distance requirements of Section 26454.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1536.)
-------------------------------------------

26304.

(a) Power brakes on any trailer or semitrailer manufactured after December 31, 1955, operated over public highways and required to be equipped with brakes shall be designed to be automatically applied upon breakaway from the towing vehicle and shall be capable of stopping and holding such vehicle stationary for not less than 15 minutes.

(b) Every new truck or truck tractor manufactured after December 31, 1955, operated over public highways and used in towing a vehicle shall be equipped with service brakes capable of stopping the truck or truck tractor in the event of breakaway of the
 towed vehicle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 733.)
-------------------------------------------

26305.

Any auxiliary dolly or tow dolly may be equipped with brakes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 708, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

26307.

No forklift truck manufactured after January 1, 1970, shall be towed behind another vehicle unless it is equipped with brakes on the wheels of the rearmost axle when the forklift truck is in the towing position, which brakes shall be adequate, supplemental to the brakes on the towing vehicle, to enable the combination of vehicles to comply with the stopping distance requirements of Section 26454.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 132.)
-------------------------------------------

26311.

(a) Every motor vehicle shall be equipped with service brakes on all wheels in contact with the roadway, except as follows:

(1) Trucks and truck tractors manufactured before July 25, 1980, having three or more axles need not have brakes on the front wheels, except when such vehicles are equipped with at least two steerable axles, the wheels of one such axle need not be equipped with brakes.

(2) The final towed vehicle in a triple saddle-mount driveaway-towaway operation.

(3) Any vehicle manufactured prior to 1930.

(4) Any two-axle truck tractor manufactured prior to 1964.

(5) Any sidecar attached to a motorcycle.

(6) Any motorcycle manufactured prior to 1966. Such motorcycle shall be equipped with brakes on at least one wheel.

(b) Any bus, truck, or truck tractor may be equipped with a manual or automatic means for reducing the braking effort on the front wheels. The manual means shall be used only when operating under adverse road conditions, such as wet, snowy, or icy roads.

(c) Vehicles and combinations of vehicles exempted in subdivisions (a) and (b) from the requirements of brakes on all wheels shall comply with the stopping distance requirements of Section
 26454.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 451, Sec. 53.   (SB 491)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Operation of Brakes [26450. - 26458.5.]

26450.

Every motor vehicle shall be equipped with a service brake system and every motor vehicle, other than a motorcycle, shall be equipped with a parking brake system. Both the service brake and parking brake shall be separately applied.

If the two systems are connected in any way, they shall be so constructed that failure of any one part, except failure in the drums, brakeshoes, or other mechanical parts of the wheel brake assemblies, shall not leave the motor vehicle without operative brakes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

26451.

The parking brake system of every motor vehicle shall comply with the following requirements:

(a) The parking brake shall be adequate to hold the vehicle or combination of vehicles stationary on any grade on which it is operated under all conditions of loading on a surface free from snow, ice or loose material. In any event the parking brake shall be capable of locking the braked wheels to the limit of traction.

(b) The parking brake shall be applied either by the driver’s muscular efforts, by spring action, or by other
 energy which is isolated and used exclusively for the operation of the parking brake or the combination parking brake and emergency stopping system.

(c) The parking brake shall be held in the applied position solely by mechanical means.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 774, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

26452.

All motor vehicles shall be so equipped as to permit application of the brakes at least once for the purpose of bringing the vehicle to a stop within the legal stopping distance after the engine has become inoperative.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

26453.

All brakes and component parts thereof shall be maintained in good condition and in good working order. The brakes shall be so adjusted as to operate as equally as practicable with respect to the wheels on opposite sides of the vehicle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2183.)
-------------------------------------------

26454.

(a) The service brakes of every motor vehicle or combination of vehicles shall be adequate to control the movement of and to stop and hold the vehicle or combination of vehicles under all conditions of loading.

(b) Every motor vehicle or combination of vehicles, at any time and under all conditions of loading, shall, upon application of the service brake, be capable of stopping from an initial speed of 20 miles per hour according to the following requirements:Maximum

 Stopping
 Distance
(feet)(1) Passenger-carrying vehicles with a seating capacity of 10 or fewer persons, including the driver, and built on a passenger car chassis 20(2) Passenger-carrying vehicles with a seating capacity of more than 10 persons, including the driver, and built on a passenger car chassis; vehicles built on a truck or bus chassis and having a GVWR of 10,000 pounds or less 25(3) All other passenger-carrying vehicles 35(4) Single-unit property-carrying vehicles having a GVWR of 10,000 pounds or less 25(5) Single-unit property-carrying vehicles having a GVWR of more than 10,000 pounds, except truck tractors; combinations of a 2-axle towing vehicle and trailer having a GVWR of 3,000 pounds or less; all combinations of 2 or fewer vehicles in driveaway or towaway operation 35(6) All other property-carrying vehicles and combinations of property-carrying vehicles 40(c) Every motor vehicle or combination of vehicles, at any time and under all conditions of loading, shall, upon application of the service brake, be capable of developing a braking force at least equal to the percentage of its gross weight according to the following requirements:Braking force as a percentage of gross vehicle or combination weight
(1) Passenger-carrying vehicles with a seating capacity of 10 or fewer persons, including the driver, and built on a passenger
 car chassis 65.2(2) Passenger-carrying vehicles with a seating capacity of more than 10 persons, including driver, and built on a passenger car chassis; vehicles built on a truck or bus chassis and having a GVWR of 10,000 pounds or less 52.8(3) All other passenger-carrying vehicles 43.5(4) Single-unit property-carrying vehicles having a GVWR of 10,000 pounds or less
 52.8(5) Single-unit property-carrying vehicles having a GVWR of more than 10,000 pounds, except truck tractors; combinations of a 2-axle towing vehicle and trailer having a GVWR of 3,000 pounds or less; all combinations of 2 or fewer vehicles in driveaway or towaway operation 43.5(6) All other property-carrying vehicles and combinations of property-carrying vehicles 43.5(d) Every motor vehicle or combination of vehicles, at any time and under all conditions off loading, shall, upon application of the service brake, be capable of decelerating to a stop from 20 miles per hour at not less than the rate specified in the following requirements:Deceleration in
 feet per second(1) Passenger-carrying vehicles with a seating capacity of 10 or fewer persons, including the driver, and built on a passenger car chassis 21(2) Passenger-carrying vehicles
 with a seating capacity of more than 10 persons, including the driver, and built on a passenger car chassis; vehicles built on a truck or bus chassis and having a GVWR of 10,000 pounds or less 17(3) All other passenger-carrying vehicles 14(4) Single-unit property-carrying vehicles having a GVWR of 10,000 pounds or less 17(5) Single-unit property-carrying vehicles having a GVWR of more
 than 10,000 pounds, except truck tractors; combinations of a 2-axle towing vehicle and trailer having a GVWR of 3,000 pounds or less; all combinations of 2 or fewer vehicles in driveaway or towaway operation 14(6) All other property-carrying vehicles and combinations of property-carrying vehicles 14(e) Upon application of its service brakes, a motor vehicle or combination of motor vehicles shall, under any condition of loading in which it is found on a public highway, be capable of stopping within the distance specified in subdivision (b) and developing only the braking
 force specified in subdivision (c), if braking force is measured by a performance-based brake tester that meets the requirements of functional specifications for performance-based brake testers for commercial motor vehicles and braking force is the sum of the braking force at each wheel of the vehicle or vehicle combination as a percentage of gross vehicle or combination weight.

(f) Upon application of its emergency brake system and with no other brake system applied, a motor vehicle or combination of motor vehicles shall, under any condition of loading in which it is found on a public highway, be capable of stopping from 20 miles per hour in a distance, measured from the point at which movement of the emergency brake control begins, that is not greater than the distance specified in the following:Maximum
Stopping
Distance 
(feet)(1) Passenger-carrying vehicles with a seating capacity of 10 or fewer persons, including the driver, and built on a passenger car chassis 54(2) Passenger-carrying vehicles with a seating capacity of more than 10 persons, including the driver, and built on a passenger car chassis; vehicles built on a truck or bus chassis and having a GVWR of 10,000 pounds or less 66(3) All other
 passenger-carrying vehicles 85(4) Single-unit property-carrying vehicles having a GVWR of 10,000 pounds or less 66(5) Single-unit property-carrying vehicles having a GVWR of more than 10,000 pounds, except truck tractors; combinations of a 2-axle towing vehicle and trailer having a GVWR of 3,000 pounds or less; all combinations of 2 or fewer vehicles in driveaway or towaway operation 85(6) All other property-carrying vehicles and combinations of property-carrying vehicles 90(g) Conformity to the stopping-distance requirements of this section shall be determined under the following conditions:

(1) Any test shall be made with the vehicle on a hard surface that is substantially level, dry, smooth, and free of loose material.

(2) The vehicle shall be in the center of a 12-foot-wide lane when the test begins and shall not deviate from that lane during the test.

(h) For purposes of this section, “GVWR” means the manufacturer’s gross vehicle weight rating, as
 defined in Section 350.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 208, Sec. 21.   (AB 2906)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26455.

In respect to any motor vehicle designed, used or maintained primarily for the transportation of property which is not equipped with a plate or marker showing the manufacturer’s gross vehicle weight rating, for purposes of stopping distance requirements, the weight of a vehicle shall be determined as follows:

(a) Any motor vehicle having less than six wheels is the equivalent of a vehicle having a manufacturer’s gross vehicle weight rating of less than 10,000 pounds.

(b) Any motor vehicle having six wheels or more is the equivalent of a vehicle
 having a manufacturer’s gross vehicle weight rating of 10,000 pounds or more.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

26456.

Stopping distance requirement tests shall be conducted on a substantially level, dry, smooth, hard-surfaced road that is free from loose material and where the grade does not exceed plus or minus 1 percent. Stopping distance shall be measured from the instant brake controls are moved and from an initial speed of approximately 20 miles per hour. No test of brake performance shall be made upon a highway at a speed in excess of 25 miles per hour.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

26457.

Special mobile equipment, logging vehicles, equipment operated under special permit, and any chassis without body or load are not subject to stopping distance requirements, but if any such vehicle or equipment cannot be stopped within 32 feet from an initial speed of 15 miles per hour, it shall not be operated at a speed in excess of that permitting a stop in 32 feet.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 517.)
-------------------------------------------

26458.

(a) The braking system on every motor vehicle used to tow another vehicle shall be so arranged that one control on the towing vehicle shall, when applied, operate all the service brakes on the power unit and combination of vehicles when either or both of the following conditions exist: 

(1) The towing vehicle is required to be equipped with power brakes. 

(2) The towed vehicle is required to be equipped with brakes and is equipped with power brakes. 

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not be construed to prohibit motor vehicles from being equipped with an additional control to be used to operate the brakes on the trailer or trailers. 

(c) Subdivision (a) does not apply to any of the following combinations of vehicles, if the combination of vehicles meets the stopping distance requirements of Section 26454: 

(1) Vehicles engaged in driveaway-towaway operations. 

(2) Disabled vehicles, while being towed. 

(3) Towed motor vehicles.

(4) Trailers equipped with inertially controlled brakes which are designed to be applied automatically upon breakaway from the towing vehicle and which are capable of stopping and holding the trailer
 stationary for not less than 15 minutes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 121, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

26458.5.

Pursuant to Section 26458, whenever a motor vehicle is equipped with an additional control to operate the brakes on a trailer, that control shall not be used in lieu of the service brake control, except in the case of failure of the service brake system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 316, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Airbrakes [26502. - 26508.]

26502.

(a) Airbrakes of every motor vehicle and combination of vehicles shall be so adjusted and maintained as to be capable of providing full service brake application at all times except as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 26311. A full service brake application shall deliver to all brake chambers not less than 90 percent of the air reservoir pressure remaining with the brakes applied. 

(b) The department may by regulation authorize the use of special devices or systems to automatically reduce the maximum air pressure delivered to the brake chambers in order to compensate for load variation
 and to obtain balanced braking. Permitted systems shall be of the fail safe type and shall not increase the vehicle stopping distance.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1789.)
-------------------------------------------

26503.

Every motor vehicle equipped with airbrakes or equipped to operate airbrakes on towed vehicles shall be equipped with a standard type safety valve which shall be installed so as to have an uninterrupted connection with the air reservoir or tank. It shall be adjusted and maintained so that it will open and discharge the air system under any condition at a pressure of not to exceed 150 pounds per square inch and close and reseat itself at a point above the maximum air governor setting. The department may by regulation prescribe a higher maximum opening pressure for air pressure systems designed for, and capable of safely operating with, pressure safety valves with a higher
 opening pressure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1578.)
-------------------------------------------

26504.

The air governor cut-in and cut-out pressures of every motor vehicle equipped with airbrakes or equipped to operate airbrakes on towed vehicles shall be adjusted so that the maximum pressure in the air system and the minimum cut-in pressure shall be within limits prescribed by the department. In adopting regulations specifying such pressures the department shall consider the safe operating capacities of the various airbrake systems which are now or may be used on motor vehicles and shall be guided by the designed capabilities of those systems.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1578.)
-------------------------------------------

26505.

A motor vehicle equipped with airbrakes or equipped to operate airbrakes on towed vehicles shall be equipped with a pressure gauge of reliable and satisfactory construction and maintained in an efficient working condition, accurate within 10 percent of the actual air reservoir pressure, and visible and legible to a person when seated in the driving position.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 491, Sec. 46.   (SB 1318)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

26506.

(a) Every motor vehicle airbrake system used to operate the brakes on a motor vehicle or on a towed vehicle shall be equipped with a low air pressure warning device that complies with either the requirements set forth in the Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standards in effect at the time of manufacture or the requirements of subdivision (b).

(b) The device shall be readily visible or audible to the driver and shall give a satisfactory continuous warning when the air supply pressure
 drops below a fixed pressure, which shall be not more than 75 pounds per square inch nor less than 55 pounds per square inch with the engine running. A gauge indicating pressure shall not satisfy this requirement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1241, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

26507.

A check valve shall be installed and properly maintained in the air supply piping of every motor vehicle equipped with airbrakes, either between the air compressor and the first reservoir or tank immediately adjacent to the air intake of said reservoir, or between No. 1 reservoir (wet tank) and No. 2 reservoir (dry tank) immediately adjacent to the air intake of the No. 2 reservoir; provided, that the air supply for the brakes is not drawn from the No. 1 reservoir and that the No. 1 and No. 2 reservoirs are connected by only one pipeline.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 510.)
-------------------------------------------

26508.

Every vehicle or combination of vehicles using compressed air at the wheels for applying the service brakes shall be equipped with an emergency stopping system meeting the requirements of this section and capable of stopping the vehicle or combination of vehicles in the event of failure in the service brake air system as follows:

(a) Every motor vehicle operated either singly or in a combination of vehicles and every towed vehicle shall be equipped with an emergency stopping system.

(b) Motor vehicles used to tow vehicles that use compressed air at the wheels for applying the service brakes shall be equipped with a device or devices with
 both a manual and automatic means of actuating the emergency stopping system on the towed vehicle as follows:

(1) The automatic device shall operate automatically in the event of reduction of the service brake air supply of the towing vehicle to a fixed pressure which shall be not lower than 20 pounds per square inch nor higher than 45 pounds per square inch.

(2) The manual device shall be readily operable by a person seated in the driver’s seat, with its emergency position or method of operation clearly indicated. In no instance may the manual means be so arranged as to permit its use to prevent operation of the automatic means.

(c) Motor vehicles manufactured prior to 1964 shall be deemed to be in compliance with subdivisions (e) and (f) when equipped with axle-by-axle protected airbrakes using a separate air tank
 system for each of at least two axles, provided that each system independently meets all other requirements of this section. Each system shall be capable of being manually applied, released, and reapplied from the driver’s seat but shall not be capable of being released from the driver’s seat after any reapplication unless there is available a means which can be applied from the driver’s seat to stop and hold the vehicle or combination of vehicles.

(d) Towed vehicles shall be deemed to be in compliance with this section when:

(1) The towed vehicle is equipped with a no-bleed-back relay-emergency valve or equivalent device, so designed that the supply reservoir used to provide air for the brakes is safeguarded against backflow of air from the reservoir through the supply line,

(2) The brakes are applied automatically
 and promptly upon breakaway from the towing vehicle and maintain application for at least 15 minutes, and

(3) The combination of vehicles is capable of stopping within the distance and under the conditions specified in Section 26454.

(e) If the service brake system and the emergency stopping system are connected in any way, they shall be so constructed that a failure or malfunction in any one part of either system, including brake chamber diaphragm failure but not including failure in the drums, brake shoes, or other mechanical parts of the wheel brake assemblies, shall not leave the vehicle without one operative stopping system capable of complying with the performance requirements in Section 26454.

(f) Every emergency stopping system shall be designed so that it is capable of being manually applied, released, and
 reapplied by a person seated in the driver’s seat. The system shall be designed so that it cannot be released from the driver’s seat after any reapplication unless immediate further application can be made from the driver’s seat to stop and hold the vehicle or combination of vehicles. The emergency stopping system may also be applied automatically.

(g) A vehicle or combination of vehicles upon failure of the service brake air system shall not be driven on a highway under its own power except to the extent necessary to move the vehicles off the roadway to the nearest place of safety.

(h) A vehicle or combination of vehicles shall not be equipped with an emergency stopping system that creates a hazard on the highway, or increases the service brake stopping distance of a vehicle or combination of vehicles, or interferes in any way with the application of the service brakes on any
 vehicle or combination of vehicles.

(i) Any energy-storing device which is a part of the emergency stopping system shall be designed so that it is recharged or reset from the course of compressed air or other energy produced by the vehicle, except that energy to release the emergency stopping system may be produced by the driver’s muscular effort from the driver’s seat. A device shall not be used that can be set to prevent automatic delivery of air to protected air supply reservoirs of motor vehicle emergency stopping systems when air is available in the service brake air supply system.

(j) Any vehicle manufactured on or after January 1, 1964, which uses axle-by-axle protected airbrakes as the emergency stopping system shall use a separate air tank system for each axle, except that motor vehicles equipped with a dual or tandem treadle valve system need have no more than two
 protected air tanks in such system, one for each valve.

(k) This section does not apply to any of the following:

(1) Auxiliary dollies, special mobile equipment, or special construction equipment.

(2) Motor vehicles which are operated in a driveaway-towaway operation and not registered in this state.

(3) Disabled vehicles when being towed.

(4) Vehicles which are operated under a one-trip permit as provided in Section 4003.

(5) Vehicles which because of unladen width, length, height or weight may not be moved upon the highway without the permit specified in Section 35780.

(l) Every owner or lessee shall instruct and require that the driver be thoroughly familiar with the requirements of this section. The driver of a vehicle or combination of vehicles required to comply with the requirements of this section shall be able to demonstrate the application and release of the emergency system on the vehicle and each vehicle in the combination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 208, Sec. 22.   (AB 2906)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Vacuum Brakes [26520. - 26522.]

26520.

Motor vehicles required to be equipped with power brakes and which are equipped with vacuum or vacuum-assisted brakes shall be equipped with a properly maintained vacuum gauge of reliable and satisfactory construction, accurate within 10 percent of the actual vacuum in the supply reservoir, and visible and legible to the driver at all times.

This section shall not apply to a two-axle motor truck operated singly.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 386.)
-------------------------------------------

26521.

Motor vehicles required to be equipped with power brakes and equipped with vacuum or vacuum-assisted brakes and motor vehicles used to tow vehicles equipped with vacuum brakes or vacuum-assisted brakes shall be equipped with either an audible or visible warning signal to indicate readily to the driver when the vacuum drops to eight inches of mercury and less. A vacuum gauge shall not be deemed to meet this requirement.

This section shall not apply to a two-axle motor truck operated singly nor to any motor vehicle manufactured prior to 1964.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 386.)
-------------------------------------------

26522.

Vehicles required to be equipped with power brakes and equipped with vacuum or vacuum-assisted brakes shall have a check valve installed and properly maintained in the vacuum system between the source of vacuum and the vacuum reserve.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 386.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Windshields and Mirrors [26700. - 26712.]

26700.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b) or (c), a passenger vehicle, other than a motorcycle, and every bus, motortruck or truck tractor, and every firetruck, fire engine or other fire apparatus, whether publicly or privately owned, shall be equipped with an adequate windshield.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to any vehicle issued identification plates pursuant to Section 5004 which was not required to be equipped with a windshield at the time it was first sold or registered under the laws of this state, another state, or foreign jurisdiction.

(c) This section does not apply to an autonomous vehicle, as defined in Section 38750, that is not capable of operation with a human occupant in the vehicle, provided that this exemption is consistent with, or authorized by, any applicable federal law, regulation, or exemption thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 428, Sec. 5.   (SB 570)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

26701.

(a) No person shall sell, offer for sale, or operate any motor vehicle, except a motorcycle, manufactured after January 1, 1936, unless it is equipped with safety glazing material wherever glazing materials are used in interior partitions, doors, windows, windshields, auxiliary wind deflectors or openings in the roof.

(b) No person shall sell or offer for sale any camper manufactured after January 1, 1968, nor shall any person operate a motor vehicle registered in this state
 which is equipped with that camper, unless the camper is equipped with safety glazing materials wherever glazing materials are used in outside windows and doors, interior partitions, and openings in the roof.

(c) No person shall operate a motorcycle manufactured after January 1, 1969, equipped with a windshield containing glazing material unless it is safety glazing material.

(d) No person shall sell, offer for sale, or operate any motor vehicle equipped with red, blue, or amber translucent aftermarket material in any partitions, windows, windshields, or wind deflectors.

(e) No person shall sell, offer for sale, or operate any trailer coach manufactured after January 1, 1977, that is capable of being towed with a fifth-wheel device unless the trailer coach is equipped with safety glazing materials wherever glazing
 materials are used in windows or doors, interior partitions, and openings in the roof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 540, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

26703.

(a) No person shall replace any glazing materials used in interior partitions, doors, windows, or openings in the roof in any motor vehicle, in the outside windows, doors, interior partitions, or openings in the roof of any camper, or in windows, doors, interior partitions, or openings in the roof of a trailer coach capable of being towed with a fifth-wheel device, with any glazing material other than safety glazing material.

(b) No person shall replace any glazing material used in the windshield, rear window, auxiliary wind deflectors, or windows to the left and right of the driver with
 any material other than safety glazing material.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 900.)
-------------------------------------------

26704.

Wherever the term “safety glazing material” is used in this article, it means safety glazing material of a type meeting requirements established by the department.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 723.)
-------------------------------------------

26705.

On or after January 1, 1969, no person shall sell or offer for sale for use upon or as part of the equipment of a motorcycle any motorcycle windshield unless the glazing material used therein is safety glazing material.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1469.)
-------------------------------------------

26706.

(a) Every motor vehicle, except motorcycles, equipped with a windshield shall also be equipped with a self-operating windshield wiper.

(b) Every new motor vehicle first registered after December 31, 1949, except motorcycles, shall be equipped with two windshield wipers, one mounted on the right half and one on the left half of the windshield, except that any motor vehicle may be equipped with a single wiper so long as it meets the wiped area requirements in Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standards Governing Windshield Wiping and Washing Systems.

(c) This section does not apply to snow
 removal equipment equipped with adequate manually operated windshield wipers.

(d) This section does not apply to an autonomous vehicle, as defined in Section 38750, that is not capable of operation by a human driver seated in the vehicle, provided that this exemption is consistent with, or authorized by, any applicable federal law, regulation, or exemption thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 428, Sec. 6.   (SB 570)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

26707.

Windshield wipers required by this code shall be maintained in good operating condition and shall provide clear vision through the windshield for the driver. Wipers shall be operated under conditions of fog, snow, or rain and shall be capable of effectively clearing the windshield under all ordinary storm or load conditions while the vehicle is in operation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

26708.

(a) (1) A person shall not drive any motor vehicle with any object or material placed, displayed, installed, affixed, or applied upon the windshield or side or rear windows.

(2) A person shall not drive any motor vehicle with any object or material placed, displayed, installed, affixed, or applied in or upon the vehicle that obstructs or reduces the driver’s clear view through the windshield or side windows.

(3) This subdivision applies to a person driving a motor vehicle with the driver’s clear vision through the windshield, or side or rear windows, obstructed by snow or ice.

(b) This section does not apply to
 any of the following:

(1) Rearview mirrors.

(2) Adjustable nontransparent sunvisors that are mounted forward of the side windows and are not attached to the glass.

(3) Signs, stickers, or other materials that are displayed in a seven-inch square in the lower corner of the windshield farthest removed from the driver, signs, stickers, or other materials that are displayed in a seven-inch square in the lower corner of the rear window farthest removed from the driver, or signs, stickers, or other materials that are displayed in a five-inch square in the lower corner of the windshield nearest the driver.

(4) Side windows that are to the rear of the driver.

(5) Direction, destination, or
 terminus signs upon a passenger common carrier motor vehicle or a schoolbus, if those signs do not interfere with the driver’s clear view of approaching traffic.

(6) Rear window wiper motor.

(7) Rear trunk lid handle or hinges.

(8) The rear window or windows, if the motor vehicle is equipped with outside mirrors on both the left- and right-hand sides of the vehicle that are so located as to reflect to the driver a view of the highway through each mirror for a distance of at least 200 feet to the rear of the vehicle.

(9) A clear, transparent lens affixed to the side window opposite the driver on a vehicle greater than 80 inches in width and that occupies an area not exceeding 50 square inches of the lowest corner toward the rear of that window and that
 provides the driver with a wide-angle view through the lens.

(10) Sun screening devices meeting the requirements of Section 26708.2 installed on the side windows on either side of the vehicle’s front seat, if the driver or a passenger in the front seat has in their
 possession a letter or other document signed by a licensed physician and surgeon certifying that the person must be shaded from the sun due to a medical condition, or has in their possession a letter or other document signed by a licensed optometrist certifying that the person must be shaded from the sun due to a visual condition. The devices authorized by this paragraph shall not be used during darkness.

(11) An electronic communication device affixed to the center uppermost portion of the interior of a windshield within an area that is not greater than five inches square, if the device provides either of the following:

(A) The capability for enforcement
 facilities of the Department of the California Highway Patrol to communicate with a vehicle equipped with the device.

(B) The capability for electronic toll and traffic management on public or private roads or facilities.

(12) A portable Global Positioning System (GPS), which may be mounted in a seven-inch square in the lower corner of the windshield farthest removed from the driver or in a five-inch square in the lower corner of the windshield nearest to the driver and outside of an airbag deployment zone, if the system is used only for door-to-door navigation while the motor vehicle is being operated.

(13) (A) A video event recorder with the capability of monitoring driver performance to improve driver safety, which may be mounted in a seven-inch square in the lower corner of the windshield
 farthest removed from the driver, in a five-inch square in the lower corner of the windshield nearest to the driver and outside of an airbag deployment zone, or in a five-inch square mounted to the center uppermost portion of the interior of the windshield. As used in this section, “video event recorder” means a video recorder that continuously records in a digital loop, recording audio, video, and G-force levels, but saves video only when triggered by an unusual motion or crash or when operated by the driver to monitor driver performance.

(B) A vehicle equipped with a video event recorder shall have a notice posted in a visible location which states that a passenger’s conversation may be recorded.

(C) Video event recorders shall store no more than 30 seconds before and after a triggering event.

(D) The registered
 owner or lessee of the vehicle may disable the device.

(E) The data recorded to the device is the property of the registered owner or lessee of the vehicle.

(F) When a person is driving for hire as an employee in a vehicle with a video event recorder, the person’s employer shall provide unedited copies of the recordings upon the request of the employee or the employee’s representative. These copies shall be provided free of charge to the employee and within five days of the request.

(14) Vehicle safety technology, as defined in Section 393.5 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, installed on any vehicle listed in Section 34500 and subject to Section 34500.7 that is otherwise in compliance